Utah statutes.
53A-16-110.   Special tax to buy school building sites, build and furnish schoolhouses, or improve school property.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (6), a local school board may, by following the process for special elections established in Sections 20A-1-203 and 20A-1-204, call a special election to determine whether a special property tax should be levied for one or more years to buy building sites, build and furnish schoolhouses, or improve the school property under its control.

(b)  The tax may not exceed .2% of the taxable value of all taxable property in the district in any one year.

(2)  The board shall give reasonable notice of the election and follow the same procedure used in elections for the issuance of bonds.

(3)  If a majority of those voting on the proposition vote in favor of the tax, it is levied in addition to a levy authorized under Section 53A-17a-145 and computed on the valuation of the county assessment roll for that year.

(4) (a)  Within 20 days after the election, the board shall certify the amount of the approved tax to the governing body of the county in which the school district is located.

(b)  The governing body shall acknowledge receipt of the certification and levy and collect the special tax.

(c)  It shall then distribute the collected taxes to the business administrator of the school district at the end of each calendar month.

(5)  The special tax becomes due and delinquent and attaches to and becomes a lien on real and personal property at the same time as state and county taxes.

(6)  Notwithstanding Subsections (3) and (4), beginning January 1, 2012, a local school board may not levy a tax in accordance with this section.

